Utah statutes.
16-6a-806.   Staggered terms for directors.

(1)  The bylaws may provide for staggering the terms of directors by dividing the total number of directors into any number of groups.

(2)  The terms of office of the several groups permitted under Subsection (1) need not be uniform.

